Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chancellors, Districts and Terms

§ 9-5-1.
Chancellors; election, holding of court terms, terms of office, and residency.

A chancellor shall be elected for and from each of the chancery court districts as provided in this chapter and the listing of individual precincts shall be those precincts as they existed on October 1, 1990. He shall hold court in any other district with the consent of the chancellor thereof when in their opinion the public interest may be thereby promoted. The terms of all chancellors elected at the regular election for the year 1930 shall begin on the first day of January, 1931, and their terms of office shall continue for four (4) years. A chancellor shall be a resident of the district in which he serves but shall not be required to be a resident of a subdistrict if the district is divided into subdistricts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 1; 1871, § 978; 1880, §§ 1803, 1804; 1892, §§ 456, 458; 1906, § 505; Hemingways’s 1917, § 261; 1930, § 319; 1942 § 1227; Laws, 1930, ch. 113; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 356, § 1. (See Editor’s note).

§ 9-5-3.
Chancery court districts; terms of court; determination of appropriate number of chancellorships for each district.

The state shall be divided into an appropriate number of chancery court districts, severally numbered and composed of the counties as set forth in the sections which follow. A court to be styled “The Chancery Court of the County of_______________” shall be held in each county, and within each judicial district of a county having two (2) judicial districts, at least twice a year. Court shall be held in chancery court districts consisting of a single county on the same dates state agencies and political subdivisions are open for business excluding legal holidays. The dates upon which terms shall commence and the number of days for which terms shall continue in chancery court districts consisting of more than one (1) county shall be set by order of the chancellor in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. A matter in court may extend past a term if the interest of justice so requires.

An order establishing the commencement and continuation of terms of court for each of the counties within a chancery court district consisting of more than one (1) county shall be entered annually and not later than October 1 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the terms of court are to become effective. Notice of the dates upon which terms of court shall commence and the number of days for which the terms shall continue in each of the counties within a chancery court district shall be posted in the office of the chancery clerk of each county within the district and mailed to the office of the Secretary of State for publication and distribution to all Mississippi Bar members. If an order is not timely entered, the terms of court for each of the counties within the chancery court district shall remain unchanged for the next calendar year.

The number of chancellorships for each chancery court district shall be determined by the Legislature based upon the following criteria:

The population of the district;

The number of cases filed in the district;

The caseload of each chancellor in the district;

The geographic area of the district;

An analysis of the needs of the district by the court personnel of the district; and

Any other appropriate criteria.

The Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center and the Administrative Office of Courts shall determine the appropriate:

Specific data to be collected as a basis for applying the above criteria;

Method of collecting and maintaining the specified data; and

Method of assimilating the specified data.

In a district having more than one (1) office of chancellor, there shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of those offices except that the chancellor who has been for the longest time continuously a chancellor of that court or, should no chancellor have served longer in office than the others, the chancellor who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall be the senior chancellor. The senior chancellor shall have the right to assign causes and dockets and to set terms in districts consisting of more than one (1) county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 1455, 1790; 1892, §§ 440, 448; 1906, §§ 487, 496; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 238, 249; 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1215; Laws, 1930, ch. 113; Laws, 1936, ch. 230; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10; Laws, 1948, ch. 239, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 232, § 1; Laws, 1954 Ex. ch. 18; Laws, 1958, ch. 269, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 451, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-5.
First district; composition.

The First Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Alcorn County;

Itawamba County;

Lee County;

Monroe County;

Pontotoc County;

Prentiss County;

Tishomingo County; and

Union County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1216; Laws, 1932, chs. 141, 151; Laws, 1936, ch. 230; Laws, 1950, ch. 322; Laws, 1968, ch. 314, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-7.
First district; number of chancellors.

There shall be four (4) chancellors for the First Chancery Court District.

The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” “Place Three” and “Place Four.” The chancellor to fill Place One must be a resident of Alcorn, Prentiss or Tishomingo County. The chancellors to fill Place Two and Place Three must reside in Itawamba, Lee, Monroe, Pontotoc or Union County. The chancellor to fill Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district. Election of the four (4) offices of chancellor shall be by election to be held in every county within the First Chancery Court District.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1216.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 314, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1974, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 1, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-9.
Second district; composition.

The Second Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Jasper County;

Newton County; and

Scott County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1217; Laws, 1932, chs. 141, 142; Laws, 1936, ch. 231; Laws, 1938, ch. 278; Laws, 1940, ch. 223; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10, § 2; Laws, 1948, chs. 240, 241; Laws, 1966, ch. 326, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 496; Laws, 1977, ch. 451, § 4; Laws, 1982, ch. 355, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-11.
Third district; composition.

The Third Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

DeSoto County;

Grenada County;

Montgomery County;

Panola County;

Tate County; and

Yalobusha County.

The Third Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 3-1 shall consist of DeSoto County.

Subdistrict 3-2 shall consist of Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1218; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1946, ch. 398; Laws, 1948, ch. 242; Laws, 1958, ch. 269, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 302; Laws, 1966, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-13.
Third district; number of chancellors; number and election of chancellors of subdistricts.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Third Chancery Court District.

The chancellor of Subdistrict 3-1 shall be elected from DeSoto County. The two (2) chancellors of Subdistrict 3-2 shall be elected from Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County.

For purposes of appointment and election, the three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct. The chancellorship in Subdistrict 3-1 shall be denominated only as “Place One,” and the chancellorships in Subdistrict 3-2 shall be denominated only as “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1218.1; Laws, 1970, ch. 325, §§ 1-4, eff from; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 7; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 2, eff Jan. 1, 2007.

§ 9-5-15.
Fourth district; composition.

The Fourth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Amite County;

Franklin County;

Pike County; and

Walthall County.

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Fourth Chancery Court District. The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1219; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1942, ch. 309; Laws, 1944, ch. 313; Laws, 1948, ch. 243; Laws, 1954 Ex. Sess. ch. 18, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 8; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-17.
Fifth district; composition.

The Fifth Chancery Court District is composed of Hinds County.

The Fifth Chancery Court District shall be divided into the following four (4) subdistricts:

Subdistrict 5-1 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 44, 45, 46, 47, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 92, 93, 96 and 97.

Subdistrict 5-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, Brownsville, Cynthia, Pocahontas and Tinnin.

Subdistrict 5-3 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 31, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 86, 89 and Jackson State.

Subdistrict 5-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 87, 88, 90, 91, 94, 95, Bolton, Byram 1, Byram 2, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pinehaven, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry, Utica 1 and Utica 2.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1220; Laws, 1932, chs. 141, 150; Laws, 1934, ch. 175; Laws, 1938, ch. 279; Laws, 1948, ch. 244; Laws, 1950, ch. 315, § 2; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 217; Laws, 1975, ch. 416; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 9; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-19.
Fifth district; number and election of chancellors; divisions of court.

There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Fifth Chancery Court District. One chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into four (4) divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1220.1; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. §§ 1-5; Laws, 1956, ch. 217; Laws, 1960, ch. 226; Laws, 1971, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 10, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-5-21.
Sixth district; composition.

The Sixth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Attala County;

Carroll County;

Choctaw County;

Kemper County;

Neshoba County; and

Winston County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1221; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1934, chs. 176, 177; Laws, 1938, ch. 280; Laws, 1942, ch. 316; Laws, 1948, chs. 245, 239, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 339; Laws, 1956, ch. 218; Laws, 1966, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 306; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 11; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-22.
Sixth district; number of chancellors.

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Sixth Chancery Court District.

The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 371; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 12; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 3, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-23.
Seventh district; composition.

The Seventh Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Bolivar County;

Coahoma County;

Leflore County;

Quitman County;

Tallahatchie County; and

Tunica County.

The Seventh Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of Bolivar County and Coahoma County;

Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of Leflore County, Quitman County, Tallahatchie County and Tunica County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1222; Laws, 1932, chs. 141, 148; Laws, 1934, ch. 178; Laws, 1938, ch. 281; Laws, 1950, ch. 359; Laws, 1956, ch. 219; Laws, 1964, ch. 303; Laws, 1968, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 343; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 13; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-25.
Seventh district; number and election of chancellors.

[Until January 1, 2011, this section shall read as follows:]

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Seventh Chancery Court District. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1222.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 317, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 14; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 438, § 2, eff (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section. See Editor’s note).

§ 9-5-25.
Seventh district; number and election of chancellors.

[From and after January 1, 2011, this section shall read as follows:]

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Seventh Chancery Court District. The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 7-1 and shall be denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” and two (2) chancellors shall be elected from Subdistrict 7-2 and shall be denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1222.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 317, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 14; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 438, § 2, eff (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section. See Editor’s note).

§ 9-5-27.
Eighth district; composition.

The Eighth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Hancock County;

Harrison County; and

Stone County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1223; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1938, ch. 282; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 246; Laws, 1952, ch. 232, § 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 226; Laws, 1958, ch. 275; Laws, 1960, ch. 227; Laws, 1964, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 318, §§ 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 15; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-29.
Eighth district; number and election of chancellors; divisions of court.

There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Eighth Chancery Court District.

The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” “Place Three” and “Place Four.”

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the Eighth Chancery Court District, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into four (4) divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1223.1; Laws, 1964, ch. 305, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1972, ch. 310, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 43; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 16; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-31.
Ninth district; composition.

The Ninth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Humphreys County;

Issaquena County;

Sharkey County;

Sunflower County;

Warren County; and

Washington County.

The Ninth Chancery Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 9-1 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties:

Sunflower County: Boyer-Linn, Drew, Fairview-Hale, Indianola 2 East*, Indianola 3 North*, Indianola 3 Northeast*, Indianola 3 South*, Rome, Ruleville, Ruleville North and Sunflower Plantation; and

Washington County: American Legion, Brent Center, Buster Brown Community Center, Darlove Baptist Church*, Elks Club, Extension Building, Grace Methodist Church*, Greenville Industrial College, Leland Health Department Clinic, Leland Rotary Club, Metcalf City Hall and Potter House Church.

Subdistrict 9-2 shall consist of Humphreys County and the following precincts in the following counties:

Sunflower County: Doddsville, Indianola 2 East*, Indianola 2 West, Indianola 3 North*, Indianola 3 Northeast*, Indianola 3 South*, Indianola Southeast, Inverness, Moorhead, Sunflower 3 and Sunflower 4; and

Washington County: Arcola City Hall, Christ Wesleyan Methodist Church, Darlove Baptist Church*, Glen Allan Health Clinic, Grace Methodist Church*, Hollandale City Hall, St. James Episcopal Church, Swiftwater Baptist Church, Tampa Drive and Ward’s Recreation Center.

Subdistrict 9-3 shall consist of Issaquena County, Sharkey County and Warren County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1224; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1936, ch. 232; Laws, 1942, ch. 312; Laws, 1948, ch. 247; Laws, 1950, ch. 320; Laws, 1956, ch. 220; Laws, 1966, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 404; Laws, 1980, ch. 325; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 10; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 17; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-33.
Ninth district; number and election of chancellors.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Ninth Chancery Court District. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1224.1; Laws, 1966, ch. 331, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 18, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-5-35.
Tenth district; composition.

The Tenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Forrest County;

Lamar County;

Marion County;

Pearl River County; and

Perry County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1225; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1934, ch. 179; Laws, 1936, ch. 233; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10, § 5; Laws, 1956, ch. 221; Laws, 1958, ch. 274; Laws, 1971, ch. 319, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 325, § 2(1), 1981, ch. 492, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 19; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-36.
Tenth district; number and election of chancellors; residence.

There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Tenth Chancery Court District.

The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” “Place Three” and “Place Four.” The chancellor to fill Place One and Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district. The chancellor to fill Place Two must be a resident of Lamar, Marion, Pearl River or Perry County. The chancellor to fill Place Three must be a resident of Forrest County. Election of the four (4) offices of chancellor shall be by election to be held in every county within the Tenth Chancery Court District.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 325, § 1(1, 3); Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 44; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 20; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 5, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-37.
Eleventh district; composition.

The Eleventh Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Holmes County;

Leake County;

Madison County; and

Yazoo County.

The Eleventh Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 11-1 shall consist of Holmes County, Yazoo County and the following precincts in Madison County: Bible Church, Canton 4, Canton 5, Flora, Madison County Baptist Family Life Center, Magnolia Heights and Smith School;

Subdistrict 11-2 shall consist of Leake County and the following precincts in Madison County: Bear Creek, Camden, Cameron, Canton 1, Canton 2, Canton 3, Canton 7, Cedar Grove, Cobblestone, Couparle, Gluckstadt, Highland Colony Baptist Church, Liberty, Lorman/Cavalier, Luther Branson School, Madison 1, Madison 2, Madison 3, Main Harbor, New Industrial Park, North Bay, Ratliff Ferry, Ridgeland 1, Ridgeland 3, Ridgeland 4, Ridgeland First Methodist Church, Ridgeland Tennis Center, Sharon, Sunnybrook, Tougaloo, Trace Harbor, Victory Baptist Church, Virlilia, Whisper Lake and Yandell Road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 318; 1942, § 1226; Laws, 1932, ch. 141; Laws, 1940, ch. 224; Laws, 1966, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 446, § 1 1980, ch. 314; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 12; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 21; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-38.
Eleventh district; number and election of chancellors.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Eleventh Chancery Court District. The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 11-1 and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” one (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 11-2 and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place Two,” and one (1) chancellor shall be elected at large from the entire Eleventh Chancery Court District and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 45; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 22; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-39.
Twelfth district; composition.

The Twelfth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Clarke County; and

Lauderdale County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.2; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10, § 7; Laws, 1948, ch. 248; Laws, 1958, ch. 263; Laws, 1966, ch. 326, § 7; Laws, 1972, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 479; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 23; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-40.
Twelfth district; number of chancellors.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Twelfth Chancery Court District.

The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 312; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 24; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 6, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-41.
Thirteenth district; composition.

The Thirteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Covington County;

Jefferson Davis County;

Lawrence County;

Simpson County; and

Smith County.

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Thirteenth Chancery Court District. The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.3; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. ch. 10, § 8; Laws, 1964, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 14; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 25; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 7, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-43.
Fourteenth district; composition.

The Fourteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Chickasaw County;

Clay County;

Lowndes County;

Noxubee County;

Oktibbeha County; and

Webster County.

The Fourteenth Chancery Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 14-1 shall consist of Chickasaw County, Webster County and the following precincts in Oktibbeha County: Bell Schoolhouse*, Bradley, Center Grove, Central Starkville*, Craig Springs, Double Springs, East Starkville*, Gillespie Street Center*, Maben, North Adaton, North Longview, North Starkville 2*, North Starkville 3, Northeast Starkville, Self Creek, South Adaton, South Longview, South Starkville*, Sturgis and West Starkville*.

Subdistrict 14-2 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties:

Clay County: Cedar Bluff, Central West Point, East West Point, Siloam, South West Point and Vinton; and

Lowndes County: Air Base A, Air Base B, Air Base C, Air Base D, Air Base E, Brandon A, Brandon B, Brandon C, Brandon D, Caledonia, Columbus High School A, Columbus High School B, Columbus High School C, Columbus High School D, Dowdle Gas Training Center B, Fairgrounds C, Fairgrounds E, Fairgrounds F, Hunt C, Lee Middle School, Mitchell A, New Hope A, New Hope B, New Hope C, New Hope D, New Hope E, Rural Hill A, Rural Hill B, Rural Hill C, Sale A, Sale B, Sale C, Steens A, Steens B, Steens C, Trinity B, Union Academy B, Union Academy C and University A.

Subdistrict 14-3 shall consist of Noxubee County and the following precincts in the following counties:

Clay County: Cairo, Caradine, North West Point, Pheba, Pine Bluff, Tibbee, Union Star and West West Point;

Lowndes County: Artesia, Coleman A, Coleman B, Crawford A, Fairgrounds A, Fairgrounds B, Fairgrounds D, Fairgrounds G, Hunt A, Hunt B, Mitchell B, New Hope F, Plum Grove A, Plum Grove B, Plum Grove C, Propst Park Community Hut, Trinity A, Union Academy A, University B, West Lowndes A and West Lowndes B; and

Oktibbeha County: Bell Schoolhouse*, Central Starkville*, East Starkville*, Gillespie Street Center*, Hickory Grove, North Starkville 2*, Oktoc, Osborn, Sessums, South Starkville*, Southeast Oktibbeha and West Starkville*.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.7; Laws, 1948, ch. 239, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 230; Laws, 1956, ch. 222; Laws, 1968, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 26; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-45.
Fourteenth district; number and election of chancellors.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Fourteenth Chancery Court District. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.7-01; Laws, 1970, ch. 326, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 27, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-5-47.
Fifteenth district; composition.

The Fifteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Copiah County; and

Lincoln County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.8; Laws, 1950, ch. 315, §§ 3-7; Laws, 1952, ch. 231, §§ 1-3 (paragraphs 2, 3, 5); Laws, 1962, ch. 280, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1971, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 302; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 16; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 28; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-49.
Sixteenth district; composition.

The Sixteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

George County;

Greene County; and

Jackson County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.9; Laws, 1952, ch. 232, §§ 3-8; Laws, 1954, ch. 246, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 306 § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 17; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 29; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-50.
Sixteenth district; number and election of chancellors.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Sixteenth Chancery Court District.

The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 431; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 46; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 30; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-51.
Seventeenth district; composition; division; number and election of chancellors.

The Seventeenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Adams County;

Claiborne County;

Jefferson County; and

Wilkinson County.

The Seventeenth Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 17-1 shall consist of Claiborne County, Jefferson County, and the following precincts in Adams County: Airport Carpenter*, Convention Center*, Foster Mound, Maryland*, Northside School, Palestine, Pine Ridge, Thompson and Washington*.

Subdistrict 17-2 shall consist of Wilkinson County and the following precincts in Adams County: Beau Pre, Bellemont, By-Pass Fire Station, Carpenter*, Concord, Convention Center*, Courthouse, Duncan Park, Kingston, Liberty Park, Maryland*, Morgantown, Oakland and Washington.

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Seventeenth Chancery Court District. One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.95; Laws, 1954, Ex. ch. 18, §§ 2-4, 6, 7; Laws, 1971, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 478; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 18; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 31; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-53.
Eighteenth district; composition.

The Eighteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Benton County;

Calhoun County;

Lafayette County;

Marshall County; and

Tippah County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.96; Laws, 1958, ch. 269, §§ 2-4, 6, 7 (paragraphs 1-5); Laws, 1960, ch. 229 (paragraph 2); Laws, 1964, ch. 307 (paragraph 2); Laws, 1966, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 19; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 32; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-54.
Eighteenth district; number of chancellors.

There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Eighteenth Chancery Court District.

The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 387; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 33; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 8, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-55.
Nineteenth district; composition.

The Nineteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties:

Jones County; and

Wayne County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1226.97; Laws, 1966, ch. 326, §§ 2-5; Laws, 1968, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 359; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 34; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-57.
Twentieth district; composition.

The Twentieth Chancery Court District shall be Rankin County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 451, §§ 1, 2; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 355, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 21; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 35; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-5-58.
Twentieth district; number and election of chancellors.

There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Twentieth Chancery Court District. For purposes of appointment and election the three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 36; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).